District of Columbia statutes.
29-610.05

Reinstatement.

(a)

A partnership whose statement of qualification has been revoked administratively under § 29-610.04 may apply to the Mayor for reinstatement of the statement of qualification not later than 2 years after the effective date of the revocation. The application must state:

(1)

The name of the partnership at the time of the statement of qualification was administratively revoked, and, if needed, a different name that satisfies §§ 29-103.01 and 29-103.02;

(2)

The address of the principal office of the partnership and the name and address of its registered agent;

(3)

The effective date of administrative revocation of the partnership’s statement of qualification; and

(4)

That the grounds for revocation did not exist or have been cured.

(b)

To have its statement of qualification reinstated, a partnership must pay all fees, taxes, and penalties that were due to the Mayor at the time of the administrative revocation and all fees, taxes, and penalties that would have been due to the Mayor while the partnership’s statement of qualification was revoked administratively.

(c)

If the Mayor determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section, is satisfied that the information is correct, and determines that all payments required to be made to the Mayor by subsection (b) of this section have been made, the Mayor shall:

(1)

Cancel the statement of revocation;

(2)

Prepare a statement of reinstatement stating the Mayor’s determination and the effective date of reinstatement;

(3)

File the statement of reinstatement; and

(4)

Serve a copy on the partnership.

(d)

When reinstatement under this section is effective:

(1)

It relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative revocation; and

(2)

The partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership continues as if the revocation had never occurred, except for the rights of a person arising out of an act or omission in reliance on the revocation before the person knew or had notice of the reinstatement.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(10), 59 DCR 13171

History

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes